liblouis-back-translation-tables/ms-my-g2-abk.ctb
# Letter G
always gahara 1245-125-1235
contraction ghr
always gajikan 1245-1-245-24-345
prfword gama 1245-134
contraction gm
always gamaan 1245-134-12456
prfword gamakah 1245-134-126
always gamakan 1245-134-345
always gamaku 1245-134-13-136
prfword gamalah 1245-134-156
always gamamu 1245-134-134-136
always gamanya 1245-134-246-1
always gandakan 1245-12456-145-1-345
prfword gala 1245-123
contraction gl
always galaan 1245-123-12456
prfword galakah 1245-123-126
word galakan 1245-1-123-1-13-12456
prfword galakankah 1245-1-123-1-13-12456-126
always galakanku 1245-1-123-1-13-12456-13-136
prfword galakanlah 1245-1-123-1-13-12456-156
always galakanmu 1245-1-123-1-13-12456-134-136
always galakannya 1245-1-123-1-13-12456-246-1
always galaku 1245-123-13-136
prfword galalah 1245-123-156
always galamu 1245-123-134-136
always galanya 1245-123-246-1
word segala 1456-1245-123
word segalanya 1456-1245-123-246-1
always galikan 1245-1-123-24-345
prfword gara 1245-1235
contraction gr
always garaan 1245-1235-12456
endword garakah 1245-1235-126
always garakan 1245-1235-345
always garaku 1245-1235-13-136
endword garalah 1245-1235-156
always garamu 1245-1235-134-136
always garanya 1245-1235-246-1
always garukan 1245-1-1235-136-345
prfword gawa 1245-2456
contraction gw
always gawakan 1245-2456-345
always awaikan 1-2456-1-24-345
prfword gaya 1245-13456
contraction gy
always gayaan 1245-13456-12456
prfword gayakah 1245-13456-126
always gayakan 1245-13456-345
always gayaku 1245-13456-13-136
prfword gayalah 1245-13456-156
always gayamu 1245-13456-134-136
always gayanya 1245-13456-246-1
always gebukan 1245-15-12-136-345
always gelah 1245-15-156
always gelahkan 1245-15-156-345
always gelikan 1245-15-123-24-345
always gemakan 1245-15-134-1-345
word gemala 1245-15-134-123
always gemalakan 1245-15-134-123-345
word gembala 1245-15-134-12-123
always gembalaan 1245-15-134-12-123-12456
always gembalakah 1245-15-134-12-123-126
always gembalakan 1245-15-134-12-123-345
always gembalaku 1245-15-134-12-123-13-136
always gembalalah 1245-15-134-12-123-156
always gembalamu 1245-15-134-12-123-134-136
always gembalanya 1245-15-134-12-123-246-1
always bergembala 23-1245-15-134-12-123
always digembala 256-1245-15-134-12-123
always menggembala 34-346-1245-15-134-12-123
always penggembala 1256-346-1245-15-134-12-123
always segembala 1456-1245-15-134-12-123
always gendala 1245-26-145-123
always gendalakan 1245-26-145-123-345
always gerhana 1245-15-1235-125-1345
always gerhanakan 1245-15-1235-125-1345-345
always gesakan 1245-15-234-1-345
always ghani =
always gina =
always godakan 1245-135-145-1-345
always guakan 1245-136-1-345
always gulakan 1245-136-123-1-345
always gulikan 1245-136-123-24-345
word guru 1245
word gurukah 1245-25-126
word gurukan 1245-25-345
word guruku 1245-25-13-136
word gurukukah 1245-25-13-136-126
word gurukulah 1245-25-13-136-156
word gurulah 1245-25-156
word gurumu 1245-25-134-136
word gurumukah 1245-25-134-136-126
word gurumulah 1245-25-134-136-156
word gurunya 1245-25-246-1
word gurunyakah 1245-25-246-1-126
word gurunyalah 1245-25-246-1-156
word berguru 23-25-1245
word bergurukah 23-25-1245-25-126
word bergurukan 23-25-1245-25-345
word bergurulah 23-25-1245-25-156
word bergurunya 23-25-1245-25-246-1
always digurui 256-25-1245-25-24
word diperguru 256-356-25-1245
always dipergurui 256-356-25-1245-25-24
always dipergurukan 256-356-25-1245-25-345
always keguruan 235-25-1245-25-12456
always keguruankan 235-25-1245-25-12456-345
always menggurui 34-346-25-1245-25-24
always peguruan 1256-25-1245-25-12456
always peguruankan 1256-25-1245-25-12456-345
word perguru 356-25-1245
always perguruan 356-25-1245-25-12456
always perguruankan 356-25-1245-25-12456-345
always pergurukan 356-25-1245-25-345
word seguru 1456-25-1245
always seguruan 1456-25-1245-25-12456
always segurukah 1456-25-1245-25-126
always segurukan 1456-25-1245-25-345
always segurulah 1456-25-1245-25-156
always seguruku 1456-25-1245-25-13-136
always segurunya 1456-25-1245-25-246-1
always seperguruan 1456-356-25-1245-25-12456
always seperguruankan 1456-356-25-1245-25-12456-345
always gusakan 1245-136-234-1-345
always ganti 5-1245
always gantikan 5-1245-345
always guna 456-1245
always gunakan 456-1245-345

# Letter H
prfword haba 125-12
contraction hb
prfword habaan 125-12-12456
prfword habakah 125-12-126
always habakan 125-12-345
always habaku 125-12-13-136
prfword habalah 125-12-156
always habamu 125-12-134-136
always habanya 125-12-246-1
always habukan 125-1-12-136-345
always hajikan 125-1-245-24-345
prfword haka 125-13
contraction hk
always hakaan 125-13-12456
prfword hakakah 125-13-126
always hakakan 125-13-345
always hakaku 125-13-13-136
prfword hakalah 125-13-156
always hakamu 125-13-134-136
always hakanya 125-13-246-1
prfword hala 125-123
contraction hl
always halaan 125-123-12456
prfword halakah 125-123-126
always halakan 125-123-345
always halaku 125-123-13-136
prfword halalah 125-123-156
always halamu 125-123-134-136
always halanya 125-123-246-1
always halaman 125-1-123-1-134-12456
always halamankan 125-1-123-1-134-12456-345
prfword hama 125-134
contraction hm
always hamaan 125-134-12456
prfword hamakah 125-134-126
always hamakan 125-134-345
always hamaku 125-134-13-136
prfword hamalah 125-134-156
always hamamu 125-134-134-136
always hamanya 125-134-246-1
always hambakan 125-2346-12-1-345
always hampakan 125-2346-1234-1-345
prfword hana 125-1345
contraction hn
always hanaan 125-1345-12456
always hanaan 125-1345-12456
prfword hanakah 125-1345-126
always hanakan 125-1345-345
always hanaku 125-1345-13-136
prfword hanalah 125-1345-156
always hanamu 125-1345-134-136
always hananya 125-1345-246-1 
always hanya 5-125
always hanyakan 5-125-345
always harakan 125-1235-345
word harapa 125-1235-1234
contraction hrp
sufword hari 45-125
prfword hari 45-125
always harian 45-125-12456
prfword harikah 45-125-126
always harikan 45-125-345
always hariku 45-125-13-136
prfword harilah 45-125-156
always harimu 45-125-134-136
always harinya 45-125-246-1
always hartakan 125-1-1235-2345-1-345
always harukan 125-1-1235-136-345
always hasakan 125-234-345
always hastakan 125-1-234-2345-1-345
prfword hawa 125-2456
contraction hw
always hawaan 125-2456-12456
prfword hawakah 125-2456-126
always hawakan 125-2456-345
always hawaku 125-2456-13-136
prfword hawalah 125-2456-156
always hawamu 125-2456-134-136
always hawanya 125-2456-246-1
always helah 125-15-156
always helahkan 125-15-156-345
word hendak 125
begword hendak 125-25
midword hendak 25-125-25
endword hendak 25-125
sufword hendakkan 125-25-345
sufword berhendakkan 23-25-125-25-345
sufword berkehendakkan 23-235-25-125-25-345
sufword menghendakkan 34-346-25-125-25-345
endword hendakkan 25-125-25-345
always hentikan 125-26-2345-24-345
always hidukan 125-24-145-136-345
always hinakan 125-24-1345-1-345
always hingga 456-125
always hinggakan 456-125-345
always hubaya 125-136-12-13456
midendword hudan 125-136-145-12456
always hulukan 125-136-125-136-345
always huru-hara 125-136-1235-136-36-125-1235

# Letter I
always iagakan 24-1-1245-1-345
always iaitu 24-1-25-1346
always ianat =
always iang 24-1-346
always iasakan 24-1-234-1-345
always ibakan 24-12-1-345
always ibukan 24-12-136-345
always ibubapa 24-12-136-12-1234
always ieng 24-15-346
always igama 24-1245-134
word ikan 24-345
prfword ikanan 24-345-12456
word ikankah 24-345-126
word ikanku 24-345-13-136
word ikankukah 24-345-13-136-126
word ikankulah 24-345-13-136-156
word ikanlah 24-345-156
word ikanmu 24-345-134-136
word ikanmukah 24-345-134-136-126
word ikanmulah 24-345-134-136-156
word ikannya 24-345-246-1
word ikannyakah 24-345-246-1-126
word ikannyalah 24-345-246-1-156
always perikanan 356-24-345-12456
always ikat =
always ikatkan 24-13-1-2345-345
always ikut =
always ikutkan 24-13-136-2345-345
always ilah 24-156
word ilahi =
always ilahkan 24-156-345
always ilakan 24-123-1-345
always ilmukan 24-123-134-136-345
always imbakan 24-134-12-1-345
always imbang 5-24
always imbangkan 5-24-345
always impikan 24-134-1234-24-345
always in 35
#  match [bcdfhjklmnpqrstvwxyz] in ![^_] 24-1345
#  match - in an 35
always inaikan 24-1345-1-24-345
always inam 24-1345-2346
always inang 24-1345-1-346
always incikan 35-14-24-345
always indukan 35-145-136-345
always ine =
always ing 24-346
always ingat 45-24
always ingatkan 45-24-345
word ingin 24-346-35
always inginan 24-346-35-12456
prfword inginkah 24-346-35-126
always inginkan 24-346-35-345
always inginku 24-346-35-13-136
prfword inginlah 24-346-35-156
always inginmu 24-346-35-134-136
always inginnya 24-346-35-246-1
word ini 24
word inikah 24-25-126
word inikan 24-25-345
word iniku 24-25-13-136
word inilah 24-25-156
word inimu 24-25-134-136
word ininya 24-25-246-1
always inipun 24-25-1234
always inin 24-1345-35
always ining 24-1345-24-346
always intakan 35-2345-1-345
always intaikan 35-2345-1-24-345
always intikan 35-2345-24-345
always inya 24-246-1
always ipikan 24-1234-24-345
always ipukan 24-1234-136-345
always irakan 24-1235-1-345
always irukan 24-1235-136-345
always isakan 24-234-1-345
always islam 24-234-123-2346
always islamkan 24-234-123-2346-345
always istakan 24-234-2345-1-345
always istanakan 24-234-2345-1345-345
always isterikan 24-234-2345-15-1235-24-345
always peristeri 356-24-234-2345-15-1235-24
always peristerikan 356-24-234-2345-15-1235-24-345
always istiadat =
always istimewakan 24-234-2345-24-34-2456-1-345
word itu 1346
word itukah 1346-25-126
sufword itukan 1346-25-345

word ituku 1346-25-13-136
word itulah 1346-25-156

word itumu 1346-25-134-136
word itunya 1346-25-246-1
always itupun 1346-25-1234
always iwikat 24-2456-24-345
always izin 24-1356-35
always izinkan 24-1356-35-345

# Letter J
